District of Columbia statutes.
34-1262.01

Prohibition of discrimination.

(a)

A cable operator shall not refuse to hire or employ, discharge, or otherwise discriminate against any person for any reason provided in Unit A of Chapter 14 of Title 2.

(b)

The provisions of the Human Rights Act shall apply to a cable operator.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1201
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
The Human Rights Act, referred to in subsec. (b), is the Human rights Act of 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, Dec. 13, 1977, 24 DCR 6038, which is classified to § 2-1401.01 et seq.